Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [122A.93] INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT. new text end new text begin ARTICLE I new text end new text begin PURPOSE new text end new text begin The purpose of this compact is to facilitate the mobility of teachers across the member states, with the goal of supporting teachers through a new pathway to licensure. Through this compact, the member states seek to establish a collective regulatory framework that expedites and enhances the ability of teachers to move across state lines. new text end new text begin This compact is intended to achieve the following objectives and should be interpreted accordingly. The member states hereby ratify the same intentions by subscribing hereto. new text end new text begin (1) Create a streamlined pathway to licensure mobility for teachers; new text end new text begin (2) Support the relocation of eligible military spouses; new text end new text begin (3) Facilitate and enhance the exchange of licensure, investigative, and disciplinary information between the member states; new text end new text begin (4) Enhance the power of state and district level education officials to hire qualified, competent teachers by removing barriers to the employment of out-of-state teachers; new text end new text begin (5) Support the retention of teachers in the profession by removing barriers to relicensure in a new state; and new text end new text begin (6) Maintain state sovereignty in the regulation of the teaching profession. new text end new text begin ARTICLE II new text end new text begin DEFINITIONS new text end new text begin As used in this compact, and except as otherwise provided, the following definitions shall govern the terms herein: new text end new text begin (1) "Active military member" means any person with full-time duty status in the armed forces of the United States, including members of the National Guard and Reserve. new text end new text begin (2) "Adverse action" means any limitation or restriction imposed by a member state's licensing authority, such as revocation, suspension, reprimand, probation, or limitation on the licensee's ability to work as a teacher. new text end new text begin (3) "Bylaws" means those bylaws established by the commission. new text end new text begin (4) "Career and technical education license" means a current, valid authorization issued by a member state's licensing authority allowing an individual to serve as a teacher in P-12 public educational settings in a specific career and technical education area. new text end new text begin (5) "Charter member states" means a member state that has enacted legislation to adopt this compact where such legislation predates the initial meeting of the commission after the effective date of the compact. new text end new text begin (6) "Commission" means the interstate administrative body which membership consists of delegates of all states that have enacted this compact, and which is known as the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact Commission. new text end new text begin (7) "Commissioner" means the delegate of a member state. new text end new text begin (8) "Eligible license" means a license to engage in the teaching profession which requires at least a bachelor's degree and the completion of a state approved program for teacher licensure. new text end new text begin (9) "Eligible military spouse" means the spouse of any individual in full-time duty status in the active armed forces of the United States including members of the National Guard and Reserve moving as a result of a military mission or military career progression requirements or are on their terminal move as a result of separation or retirement (to include surviving spouses of deceased military members). new text end new text begin (10) "Executive committee" means a group of commissioners elected or appointed to act on behalf of, and within the powers granted to them by, the commission as provided for herein. new text end new text begin (11) "Licensing authority" means an official, agency, board, or other entity of a state that is responsible for the licensing and regulation of teachers authorized to teach in P-12 public educational settings. new text end new text begin (12) "Member state" means any state that has adopted this compact, including all agencies and officials of such a state. new text end new text begin (13) "Receiving state" means any state where a teacher has applied for licensure under this compact. new text end new text begin (14) "Rule" means any regulation promulgated by the commission under this compact, which shall have the force of law in each member state. new text end new text begin (15) "State" means a state, territory, or possession of the United States, and the District of Columbia. new text end new text begin (16) "State practice laws" means a member state's laws, rules, and regulations that govern the teaching profession, define the scope of such profession, and create the methods and grounds for imposing discipline. new text end new text begin (17) "State specific requirements" means a requirement for licensure covered in coursework or examination that includes content of unique interest to the state. new text end new text begin (18) "Teacher" means an individual who currently holds an authorization from a member state that forms the basis for employment in the P-12 public schools of the state to provide instruction in a specific subject area, grade level, or student population. new text end new text begin (19) "Unencumbered license" means a current, valid authorization issued by a member state's licensing authority allowing an individual to serve as a teacher in P-12 public educational settings. An unencumbered license is not a restricted, probationary, provisional, substitute or temporary credential. new text end new text begin ARTICLE III new text end new text begin LICENSURE UNDER THE COMPACT new text end new text begin (a) Licensure under this compact pertains only to the initial grant of a license by the receiving state. Nothing herein applies to any subsequent or ongoing compliance requirements that a receiving state might require for teachers. new text end new text begin (b) Each member state shall, in accordance with the rules of the commission, define, compile, and update as necessary, a list of eligible licenses and career and technical education licenses that the member state is willing to consider for equivalency under this compact and provide the list to the commission. The list shall include those licenses that a receiving state is willing to grant to teachers from other member states, pending a determination of equivalency by the receiving state's licensing authority. new text end new text begin (c) Upon the receipt of an application for licensure by a teacher holding an unencumbered eligible license, the receiving state shall determine which of the receiving state's eligible licenses the teacher is qualified to hold and shall grant such a license or licenses to the applicant. Such a determination shall be made in the sole discretion of the receiving state's licensing authority and may include a determination that the applicant is not eligible for any of the receiving state's eligible licenses. For all teachers who hold an unencumbered license, the receiving state shall grant one or more unencumbered license(s) that, in the receiving state's sole discretion, are equivalent to the licenses held by the teacher in any other member state. new text end new text begin (d) For active military members and eligible military spouses who hold a license that is not unencumbered, the receiving state shall grant an equivalent license or licenses that, in the receiving state's sole discretion, is equivalent to the license or licenses held by the teacher in any other member state, except where the receiving state does not have an equivalent license. new text end new text begin (e) For a teacher holding an unencumbered career and technical education license, the receiving state shall grant an unencumbered license equivalent to the career and technical education license held by the applying teacher and issued by another member state, as determined by the receiving state in its sole discretion, except where a career and technical education teacher does not hold a bachelor's degree and the receiving state requires a bachelor's degree for licenses to teach career and technical education. A receiving state may require career and technical education teachers to meet state industry recognized requirements, if required by law in the receiving state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE IV new text end new text begin LICENSURE NOT UNDER THE COMPACT new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided in article III above, nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit or inhibit the power of a member state to regulate licensure or endorsements overseen by the member state's licensing authority. new text end new text begin (b) When a teacher is required to renew a license received pursuant to this compact, the state granting such a license may require the teacher to complete state specific requirements as a condition of licensure renewal or advancement in that state. new text end new text begin (c) For the purposes of determining compensation, a receiving state may require additional information from teachers receiving a license under the provisions of this compact. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit the power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of its information pertaining to teachers, or limit the application of a member state's laws or regulations governing the ownership, use, or dissemination of information pertaining to teachers. new text end new text begin (e) Nothing in this compact shall be construed to invalidate or alter any existing agreement or other cooperative arrangement which a member state may already be a party to, or limit the ability of a member state to participate in any future agreement or other cooperative arrangement to: new text end new text begin (1) award teaching licenses or other benefits based on additional professional credentials, including, but not limited to national board certification; new text end new text begin (2) participate in the exchange of names of teachers whose license has been subject to an adverse action by a member state; or new text end new text begin (3) participate in any agreement or cooperative arrangement with a non-member state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE V new text end new text begin TEACHER QUALIFICATIONS AND REQUIREMENTS FOR LICENSURE UNDER new text end new text begin THE COMPACT new text end new text begin (a) Except as provided for active military members or eligible military spouses in article III.D above, a teacher may only be eligible to receive a license under this compact where that teacher holds an unencumbered license in a member state. new text end new text begin (b) A teacher eligible to receive a license under this compact shall, unless otherwise provided for herein: new text end new text begin (1) upon their application to receive a license under this compact, undergo a criminal background check in the receiving state in accordance with the laws and regulations of the receiving state; and new text end new text begin (2) provide the receiving state with information in addition to the information required for licensure for the purposes of determining compensation, if applicable. new text end new text begin ARTICLE VI new text end new text begin DISCIPLINE AND ADVERSE ACTIONS new text end new text begin (a) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to limit the authority of a member state to investigate or impose disciplinary measures on teachers according to the state practice laws thereof. new text end new text begin (b) Member states shall be authorized to receive, and shall provide, files and information regarding the investigation and discipline, if any, of teachers in other member states upon request. Any member state receiving such information or files shall protect and maintain the security and confidentiality thereof, in at least the same manner that it maintains its own investigatory or disciplinary files and information. Prior to disclosing any disciplinary or investigatory information received from another member state, the disclosing state shall communicate its intention and purpose for such disclosure to the member state which originally provided that information. new text end new text begin ARTICLE VII new text end new text begin ESTABLISHMENT OF THE INTERSTATE TEACHER MOBILITY COMPACT new text end new text begin COMMISSION new text end new text begin (a) The interstate compact member states hereby create and establish a joint public agency known as the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact Commission: new text end new text begin (1) The commission is a joint interstate governmental agency comprised of states that have enacted the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact. new text end new text begin (2) Nothing in this interstate compact shall be construed to be a waiver of sovereign immunity. new text end new text begin (b) Membership, voting, and meetings new text end new text begin (1) Each member state shall have and be limited to one (1) delegate to the commission, who shall be given the title of commissioner. new text end new text begin (2) The commissioner shall be the primary administrative officer of the state licensing authority or their designee. new text end new text begin (3) Any commissioner may be removed or suspended from office as provided by the law of the state from which the commissioner is appointed. new text end new text begin (4) The member state shall fill any vacancy occurring in the commission within 90 days. new text end new text begin (5) Each commissioner shall be entitled to one (1) vote about the promulgation of rules and creation of bylaws and shall otherwise have an opportunity to participate in the business and affairs of the commission. A commissioner shall vote in person or by such other means as provided in the bylaws. The bylaws may provide for commissioners' participation in meetings by telephone or other means of communication. new text end new text begin (6) The commission shall meet at least once during each calendar year. Additional meetings shall be held as set forth in the bylaws. new text end new text begin (7) The commission shall establish by rule a term of office for commissioners. new text end new text begin (c) The commission shall have the following powers and duties: new text end new text begin (1) Establish a code of ethics for the commission. new text end new text begin (2) Establish the fiscal year of the commission. new text end new text begin (3) Establish bylaws for the commission. new text end new text begin (4) Maintain its financial records in accordance with the bylaws of the commission. new text end new text begin (5) Meet and take such actions as are consistent with the provisions of this interstate compact, the bylaws, and rules of the commission. new text end new text begin (6) Promulgate uniform rules to implement and administer this interstate compact. The rules shall have the force and effect of law and shall be binding in all member states. In the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond the scope of the purposes of the compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect of law. new text end new text begin (7) Bring and prosecute legal proceedings or actions in the name of the commission, provided that the standing of any member state licensing authority to sue or be sued under applicable law shall not be affected. new text end new text begin (8) Purchase and maintain insurance and bonds. new text end new text begin (9) Borrow, accept, or contract for services of personnel, including, but not limited to, employees of a member state, or an associated non-governmental organization that is open to membership by all states. new text end new text begin (10) Hire employees, elect, or appoint officers, fix compensation, define duties, grant such individuals appropriate authority to carry out the purposes of the compact, and establish the commission's personnel policies and programs relating to conflicts of interest, qualifications of personnel, and other related personnel matters. new text end new text begin (11) Lease, purchase, accept appropriate gifts or donations of, or otherwise own, hold, improve, or use, any property, real, personal or mixed, provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety. new text end new text begin (12) Sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, abandon, or otherwise dispose of any property real, personal, or mixed. new text end new text begin (13) Establish a budget and make expenditures. new text end new text begin (14) Borrow money. new text end new text begin (15) Appoint committees, including standing committees composed of members and such other interested persons as may be designated in this interstate compact, rules, or bylaws. new text end new text begin (16) Provide and receive information from, and cooperate with, law enforcement agencies. new text end new text begin (17) Establish and elect an executive committee. new text end new text begin (18) Establish and develop a charter for an executive information governance committee to advise on facilitating exchange of information; use of information, data privacy, and technical support needs, and provide reports as needed. new text end new text begin (19) Perform such other functions as may be necessary or appropriate to achieve the purposes of this interstate compact consistent with the state regulation of teacher licensure. new text end new text begin (20) Determine whether a state's adopted language is materially different from the model compact language such that the state would not qualify for participation in the compact. new text end new text begin (d) The executive committee of the Interstate Teacher Mobility Compact Commission new text end new text begin (1) The executive committee shall have the power to act on behalf of the commission according to the terms of this interstate compact. new text end new text begin (2) The executive committee shall be composed of eight voting members: new text end new text begin (i) the commission chair, vice chair, and treasurer; and new text end new text begin (ii) five members who are elected by the commission from the current membership: new text end new text begin (A) four voting members representing geographic regions in accordance with commission rules; and new text end new text begin (B) one at large voting member in accordance with commission rules. new text end new text begin (3) The commission may add or remove members of the executive committee as provided in commission rules. new text end new text begin (4) The executive committee shall meet at least once annually. new text end new text begin (5) The executive committee shall have the following duties and responsibilities: new text end new text begin (i) Recommend to the entire commission changes to the rules or bylaws, changes to the compact legislation, fees paid by interstate compact member states such as annual dues, and any compact fee charged by the member states on behalf of the commission. new text end new text begin (ii) Ensure commission administration services are appropriately provided, contractual or otherwise. new text end new text begin (iii) Prepare and recommend the budget. new text end new text begin (iv) Maintain financial records on behalf of the commission. new text end new text begin (v) Monitor compliance of member states and provide reports to the commission. new text end new text begin (vi) Perform other duties as provided in rules or bylaws. new text end new text begin (e) Meetings of the commission new text end new text begin (1) All meetings shall be open to the public, and public notice of meetings shall be given in accordance with commission bylaws. new text end new text begin (2) The commission or the executive committee or other committees of the commission may convene in a closed, non-public meeting if the commission or executive committee or other committees of the commission must discuss: new text end new text begin (i) Non-compliance of a member state with its obligations under the compact. new text end new text begin (ii) The employment, compensation, discipline or other matters, practices or procedures related to specific employees or other matters related to the commission's internal personnel practices and procedures. new text end new text begin (iii) Current, threatened, or reasonably anticipated litigation. new text end new text begin (iv) Negotiation of contracts for the purchase, lease, or sale of goods, services, or real estate. new text end new text begin (v) Accusing any person of a crime or formally censuring any person. new text end new text begin (vi) Disclosure of trade secrets or commercial or financial information that is privileged or confidential. new text end new text begin (vii) Disclosure of information of a personal nature where disclosure would constitute a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy. new text end new text begin (viii) Disclosure of investigative records compiled for law enforcement purposes. new text end new text begin (ix) Disclosure of information related to any investigative reports prepared by or on behalf of or for use of the commission or other committee charged with responsibility of investigation or determination of compliance issues pursuant to the compact. new text end new text begin (x) Matters specifically exempted from disclosure by federal or member state statute. new text end new text begin (xi) Others matters as set forth by commission bylaws and rules. new text end new text begin (3) If a meeting, or portion of a meeting, is closed pursuant to this provision, the commission's legal counsel or designee shall certify that the meeting may be closed and shall reference each relevant exempting provision. new text end new text begin (4) The commission shall keep minutes of commission meetings and shall provide a full and accurate summary of actions taken, and the reasons therefore, including a description of the views expressed. All documents considered in connection with an action shall be identified in such minutes. All minutes and documents of a closed meeting shall remain under seal, subject to release by a majority vote of the commission or order of a court of competent jurisdiction. new text end new text begin (f) Financing of the commission new text end new text begin (1) The commission shall pay, or provide for the payment of, the reasonable expenses of its establishment, organization, and ongoing activities. new text end new text begin (2) The commission may accept all appropriate donations and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials, and services, and receive, utilize, and dispose of the same, provided that at all times the commission shall avoid any appearance of impropriety or conflict of interest. new text end new text begin (3) The commission may levy on and collect an annual assessment from each member state or impose fees on other parties to cover the cost of the operations and activities of the commission, in accordance with the commission rules. new text end new text begin (4) The commission shall not incur obligations of any kind prior to securing the funds adequate to meet the same; nor shall the commission pledge the credit of any of the member states, except by and with the authority of the member state. new text end new text begin (5) The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to accounting procedures established under commission bylaws. All receipts and disbursements of funds of the commission shall be reviewed annually in accordance with commission bylaws, and a report of the review shall be included in and become part of the annual report of the commission. new text end new text begin (g) Qualified immunity, defense, and indemnification new text end new text begin (1) The members, officers, executive director, employees and representatives of the commission shall be immune from suit and liability, either personally or in their official capacity, for any claim for damage to or loss of property or personal injury or other civil liability caused by or arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties or responsibilities; provided that nothing in this paragraph shall be construed to protect any such person from suit or liability for any damage, loss, injury, or liability caused by the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. new text end new text begin (2) The commission shall defend any member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission in any civil action seeking to impose liability arising out of any actual or alleged act, error, or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that the person against whom the claim is made had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities; provided that nothing herein shall be construed to prohibit that person from retaining his or her own counsel; and provided further, that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from that person's intentional or willful or wanton misconduct. new text end new text begin (3) The commission shall indemnify and hold harmless any member, officer, executive director, employee, or representative of the commission for the amount of any settlement or judgment obtained against that person arising out of any actual or alleged act, error or omission that occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, or that such person had a reasonable basis for believing occurred within the scope of commission employment, duties, or responsibilities, provided that the actual or alleged act, error, or omission did not result from the intentional or willful or wanton misconduct of that person. new text end new text begin ARTICLE VIII new text end new text begin RULEMAKING new text end new text begin (a) The commission shall exercise its rulemaking powers pursuant to the criteria set forth in this interstate compact and the rules adopted thereunder. Rules and amendments shall become binding as of the date specified in each rule or amendment. new text end new text begin (b) The commission shall promulgate reasonable rules to achieve the intent and purpose of this interstate compact. In the event the commission exercises its rulemaking authority in a manner that is beyond purpose and intent of this interstate compact, or the powers granted hereunder, then such an action by the commission shall be invalid and have no force and effect of law in the member states. new text end new text begin (c) If a majority of the legislatures of the member states rejects a rule, by enactment of a statute or resolution in the same manner used to adopt the compact within four (4) years of the date of adoption of the rule, then such rule shall have no further force and effect in any member state. new text end new text begin (d) Rules or amendments to the rules shall be adopted or ratified at a regular or special meeting of the commission in accordance with commission rules and bylaws. new text end new text begin (e) Upon determination that an emergency exists, the commission may consider and adopt an emergency rule with 48 hours' notice, with opportunity to comment, provided that the usual rulemaking procedures shall be retroactively applied to the rule as soon as reasonably possible, in no event later than ninety (90) days after the effective date of the rule. For the purposes of this provision, an emergency rule is one that must be adopted immediately in order to: new text end new text begin (1) meet an imminent threat to public health, safety, or welfare; new text end new text begin (2) prevent a loss of commission or member state funds; new text end new text begin (3) meet a deadline for the promulgation of an administrative rule that is established by federal law or rule; or new text end new text begin (4) protect public health and safety. new text end new text begin ARTICLE IX new text end new text begin FACILITATING INFORMATION EXCHANGE new text end new text begin (a) The commission shall provide for facilitating the exchange of information to administer and implement the provisions of this compact in accordance with the rules of the commission, consistent with generally accepted data protection principles. new text end new text begin (b) Nothing in this compact shall be deemed or construed to alter, limit, or inhibit the power of a member state to control and maintain ownership of its licensee information or alter, limit, or inhibit the laws or regulations governing licensee information in the member state. new text end new text begin ARTICLE X new text end new text begin OVERSIGHT, DISPUTE RESOLUTION, AND ENFORCEMENT new text end new text begin (a) Oversight new text end new text begin (1) The executive and judicial branches of state government in each member state shall enforce this compact and take all actions necessary and appropriate to effectuate the compact's purposes and intent. The provisions of this compact shall have standing as statutory law. new text end new text begin (2) Venue is proper and judicial proceedings by or against the commission shall be brought solely and exclusively in a court of competent jurisdiction where the principal office of the commission is located. The commission may waive venue and jurisdictional defenses to the extent it adopts or consents to participate in alternative dispute resolution proceedings. Nothing herein shall affect or limit the selection or propriety of venue in any action against a licensee for professional malpractice, misconduct or any such similar matter. new text end new text begin (3) All courts and all administrative agencies shall take judicial notice of the compact, the rules of the commission, and any information provided to a member state pursuant thereto in any judicial or quasi-judicial proceeding in a member state pertaining to the subject matter of this compact, or which may affect the powers, responsibilities, or actions of the commission. new text end new text begin (4) The commission shall be entitled to receive service of process in any proceeding regarding the enforcement or interpretation of the compact and shall have standing to intervene in such a proceeding for all purposes. Failure to provide the commission service of process shall render a judgment or order void as to the commission, this compact, or promulgated rules. new text end new text begin (b) Default, technical assistance, and termination new text end new text begin (1) If the commission determines that a member state has defaulted in the performance of its obligations or responsibilities under this compact or the promulgated rules, the commission shall: new text end new text begin (i) provide written notice to the defaulting state and other member states of the nature of the default, the proposed means of curing the default or any other action to be taken by the commission; and new text end new text begin (ii) provide remedial training and specific technical assistance regarding the default. new text end new text begin (2) If a state in default fails to cure the default, the defaulting state may be terminated from the compact upon an affirmative vote of a majority of the commissioners of the member states, and all rights, privileges and benefits conferred on that state by this compact may be terminated on the effective date of termination. A cure of the default does not relieve the offending state of obligations or liabilities incurred during the period of default. new text end new text begin (3) Termination of membership in the compact shall be imposed only after all other means of securing compliance have been exhausted. Notice of intent to suspend or terminate shall be given by the commission to the governor, the majority and minority leaders of the defaulting state's legislature, the state licensing authority and each of the member states. new text end new text begin (4) A state that has been terminated is responsible for all assessments, obligations, and liabilities incurred through the effective date of termination, including obligations that extend beyond the effective date of termination. new text end new text begin (5) The commission shall not bear any costs related to a state that is found to be in default or that has been terminated from the compact, unless agreed upon in writing between the commission and the defaulting state. new text end new text begin (6) The defaulting state may appeal the action of the commission by petitioning the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices. The prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. new text end new text begin (c) Dispute resolution new text end new text begin (1) Upon request by a member state, the commission shall attempt to resolve disputes related to the compact that arise among member states and between member and non-member states. new text end new text begin (2) The commission shall promulgate a rule providing for both binding and non-binding alternative dispute resolution for disputes as appropriate. new text end new text begin (d) Enforcement new text end new text begin (1) The commission, in the reasonable exercise of its discretion, shall enforce the provisions and rules of this compact. new text end new text begin (2) By majority vote, the commission may initiate legal action in the United States District Court for the District of Columbia or the federal district where the commission has its principal offices against a member state in default to enforce compliance with the provisions of the compact and its promulgated rules and bylaws. The relief sought may include both injunctive relief and damages. In the event judicial enforcement is necessary, the prevailing party shall be awarded all costs of such litigation, including reasonable attorney's fees. The remedies herein shall not be the exclusive remedies of the commission. The commission may pursue any other remedies available under federal or state law. new text end new text begin ARTICLE XI new text end new text begin EFFECTUATION, WITHDRAWAL, AND AMENDMENT new text end new text begin (a) The compact shall come into effect on the date on which the compact statute is enacted into law in the tenth member state. new text end new text begin (1) On or after the effective date of the compact, the commission shall convene and review the enactment of each of the charter member states to determine if the statute enacted by each such charter member state is materially different from the model compact statute. new text end new text begin (2) A charter member state whose enactment is found to be materially different from the model compact statute shall be entitled to the default process set forth in article X. new text end new text begin (3) Member states enacting the compact subsequent to the charter member states shall be subject to the process set forth in article VII.c.20 to determine if their enactments are materially different from the model compact statute and whether they qualify for participation in the compact. new text end new text begin (b) If any member state is later found to be in default, or is terminated or withdraws from the compact, the commission shall remain in existence and the compact shall remain in effect even if the number of member states should be less than ten. new text end new text begin (c) Any state that joins the compact after the commission's initial adoption of the rules and bylaws shall be subject to the rules and bylaws as they exist on the date on which the compact becomes law in that state. Any rule that has been previously adopted by the commission shall have the full force and effect of law on the day the compact becomes law in that state, as the rules and bylaws may be amended as provided in this compact. new text end new text begin (d) Any member state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same. new text end new text begin (1) A member state's withdrawal shall not take effect until six (6) months after enactment of the repealing statute. new text end new text begin (2) Withdrawal shall not affect the continuing requirement of the withdrawing state's licensing authority to comply with the investigative and adverse action reporting requirements of this act prior to the effective date of withdrawal. new text end new text begin (e) This compact may be amended by the member states. No amendment to this compact shall become effective and binding upon any member state until it is enacted into the laws of all member states. new text end new text begin ARTICLE XII new text end new text begin CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY new text end new text begin This compact shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any member state or a state seeking membership in the compact, or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any other government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any member state, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the remaining member states and in full force and effect as to the member state affected as to all severable matters. new text end new text begin ARTICLE XIII new text end new text begin CONSISTENT EFFECT AND CONFLICT WITH OTHER STATE LAWS new text end new text begin (a) Nothing herein shall prevent or inhibit the enforcement of any other law of a member state that is not inconsistent with the compact. new text end new text begin (b) Any laws, statutes, regulations, or other legal requirements in a member state in conflict with the compact are superseded to the extent of the conflict. new text end new text begin (c) All permissible agreements between the commission and the member states are binding in accordance with their terms. new text end